Idaho, session 2026, H0724.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The Legislature finds that
children in foster care are among the most vulnerable individuals under the
care and supervision of the Idaho Department of Health and Welfare. It is
the intent of the Legislature to ensure their safety, health, and welfare by
articulating certain protections guaranteed to such children. It is further
the intent of the Legislature that this act govern the treatment and safety
of children while in the care or custody of the state and not be construed to
expand general government authority or diminish parental rights beyond what
is necessary to ensure the safety, health, and welfare of the child.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 12, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-1212, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-1212. FOSTER CHILD SAFETY. (1) All children placed in foster care
shall have the following safety-related rights:
(a) The right to reside in a safe and healthy environment;
(b) The freedom from physical, sexual, emotional, or other abuse. This
includes the freedom to be placed away from other children, siblings, or
individuals known to pose a credible threat of physical or sexual abuse
to the foster child, either because of the foster child's own risk fac-
tors or those of the other children, siblings, or individuals;
(c) The right to timely and appropriate medical assessments and foren-
sic testing when a child discloses sexual abuse to a mandatory reporter,
consistent with applicable Idaho law and mandatory reporting require-
ments;
(d) The right to adequate and appropriate basic essentials, including
food, shelter, clothing, and personal necessities;
(e) The right to limit, restrict, suspend, or deny visitation by court
order because visitation would be contrary to the safety and well-being
of the child. Substantiated safety concerns shall be considered by the
court to limit, restrict, suspend, or deny visitation. The court may
consider any relevant factors, including:
(i) Safety and risk assessments;
(ii) Placement and supervision decisions;
(iii) Protective plans;


(iv) Medical, behavioral health, and developmental evaluations;
and
(v) Reunification plans and case plans; and
(f) The right to reasonable consideration of the child's safety during
transitions between foster care placements when practicable and con-
sistent with the safety of the child. Nothing in this paragraph shall
be construed to delay an emergency placement or supersede a court order
or immediate safety determination. In evaluating safety, the court may
consider factors relevant to the child's circumstances, including age,
developmental needs, emotional or behavioral health, prior trauma, and
the reasons for the placement change.
(2) The department shall develop a written notice of, at a minimum, the
rights enumerated in this section. The department shall provide each child
with such written notice at the time of initial placement in foster care,
at each placement change, and at least annually. Foster homes licensed by
the department shall post the notice in a place where children have access.
Failure to provide or post such notice shall not, by itself, create a cause of
action or constitute a violation of law.
(3) The rights in this section are a broad expression of the rights of
children in foster care, are not exhaustive, and shall be interpreted and ap-
plied consistent with the best interests of the child.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the author-
ity of the state or the department beyond that which is otherwise provided by
law or be construed to create a private cause of action or a cause of action
against the state, the judiciary, the department, or any employee, agent, or
contractor thereof. Implementation of this section shall occur through ex-
isting court proceedings and department processes and shall not require new
enforcement mechanisms, agencies, reporting structures, or appropriations.
(5) Alleged violations of the rights enumerated in this section may be
raised within the child's ongoing juvenile proceeding pursuant to chapter
16, title 16, Idaho Code, by the child's attorney, guardian ad litem, court-
appointed special advocate, the department, or another party to the proceed-
ing already granted standing under existing Idaho law or by a foster par-
ent through any of the aforementioned. Reports or information submitted by
a mandatory reporter pursuant to Idaho law may be brought to the attention
of the court through any such party and considered by the court in determin-
ing whether a violation of these rights has occurred. Upon such notice, the
court shall consider the allegation and may, within its discretion, order
appropriate remedies within the juvenile proceeding to promote the safety
and welfare of the child. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
require the initiation of a separate action or to expand the jurisdiction of
the court beyond existing law. Relief under this subsection shall be limited
to corrective orders within the juvenile proceeding pursuant to chapter 16,
title 16, Idaho Code.
(6) The department shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that all
reports received pursuant to mandatory reporting laws related to a child
subject to a juvenile proceeding pursuant to chapter 16, title 16, Idaho
Code, are documented and made available for consideration by the court
within that proceeding in a manner consistent with existing confidential-
ity, evidentiary, and due process requirements.


(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of a
child, the child's representative, a foster parent, or a party to the juve-
nile proceeding pursuant to chapter 16, title 16, Idaho Code, to contact the
health and social services ombudsman regarding concerns related to the im-
plementation of this section. Any review or recommendation by the health and
social services ombudsman shall be advisory in nature and shall not create a
cause of action or alter the authority of the court or the department.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.